src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_soddad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - šoddâđ: # 
    šoddâđ+V+Inf: šoddâđ
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoodâm
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: šoodah
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šadda
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: šaddeen
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: šoddâvettee
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: šoddâv
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: šoddâp
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: šoddâvetteđ
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: šaddeh
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: šoddim
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: šoddih
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: šoodâi
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: šoddáim
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: šoddáid
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: šoddáin
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: šoodâim
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: šoodâid
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: šoddii
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: šodâččim
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: šodâččih
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: šodâččij
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: šodâččáim
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: šodâččáid
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: šodâččáin
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: šodâččijm
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: šodâččijd
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: šodâččii
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: šaddeem
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: šaddeeh
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: šoodâš
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: šodâžeen
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: šoodâšvettee
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: šodâžává
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: šodâžep
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: šoodâšvetteđ
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: šodâžeh
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: šoodâ
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: šados
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: šaddoon
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: šaddee
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: šaddoos
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: šaddop
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: šoddâđ
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: šaddoos
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: šoodâ
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: šoddâm
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: šodâččii
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: šoddii
    šoddâđ+V+PrsPrc: šaddee
    šoddâđ+V+PrfPrc: šoddâm
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Nom: šoddâm
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Ess: šoddâmin
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Loc: šoddâmist
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Ill: šoddâmân
    šoddâđ+V+Ger: šodâdijn
    šoddâđ+V+VAbess: šodâhánnáá

  Verb - viggâđ: #
    viggâđ+V+Inf: viggâđ
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viigâm
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viigah
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viggá
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viggeen
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viggâvettee
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viggâv
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viggâp
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viggâvetteđ
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viggeh
